Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB21.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "eating place," "hotel" and "restaurant" in section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words or phrases, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:* * *"Eating place" shall mean a premise where substantial food [is] offerings sufficient to constitute a meal are regularly and customarily prepared on premises or procured from a third party and sold, having a total area of not less than three hundred square feet available to the public in one or more rooms, other than living quarters, and equipped with tables and chairs, including bar seats, accommodating thirty persons at one time which must be accessible and available for use during any hour alcoholic beverages are served. The board shall, by regulation, set forth what constitutes tables and chairs sufficient to accommodate thirty persons at one time.* * *"Hotel" shall mean any reputable place operated by responsible persons of good reputation where the public may, for a consideration, obtain sleeping accommodations and meals and which, in a city, has at least ten, and in any other place at least six, permanent bedrooms for the use of guests, a public dining room or rooms operated by the same management accommodating at least thirty persons at one time, and a kitchen, apart from the public dining room or rooms, in which 20250SB0021PN0689 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [food is] substantial food offerings sufficient to constitute a meal are regularly prepared for the public.* * *"Restaurant" shall mean a reputable place operated by responsible persons of good reputation and habitually and principally used for the purpose of providing substantial food offerings sufficient to constitute a meal, prepared on premises or procured off-premises from a third party, for the public, the place to have an area within a building of not less than four hundred square feet, equipped with tables and chairs, including bar seats, accommodating at least thirty persons at one time which must be accessible and available for use during any hour alcoholic beverages are served. The board shall, by regulation, set forth what constitutes tables and chairs sufficient to accommodate thirty persons at one time.* * *"Substantial food offerings sufficient to constitute a meal" shall mean two or more entrée options and at least two or more side options set forth on a printed menu and made readily available for selection and purchase by at least thirty persons at any one time whenever alcoholic beverages are actively being served, or compliance with any minimum food requirements imposed by other State or local licensing authorities in order to obtain a health or food permit. An entrée may consist of a wide variety of food items but may not consist solely of sealed prepacked food items.* * *Section 2. Sections 212(h), 464 and 470(a)(1) of the act are amended to read:Section 212. Office of Administrative Law Judge.--* * *20250SB0021PN0689 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) The board [shall select five] may select and contract with up to seven hearing examiners [from the complement of hearing examiners], who have been appointed by the Governor [and who are employed by the board on the effective date of this subsection], to conduct the licensing hearings required by this act. The selection of the [five] hearing examiners shall be at the board's discretion.* * *Section 464. Hearings Upon Refusal of Licenses, Renewals or Transfers; Appeals.--The board may of its own motion, and shall upon the written request of any applicant for club, hotel or restaurant liquor license, or any applicant for any malt or brewed beverage license other than a public service license, or for renewal or transfer thereof, or for the renewal of an amusement permit, whose application for such license, renewal or transfer, or the renewal of an amusement permit, has been refused, fix a time and place for hearing of such application for license or for renewal or transfer thereof, or the renewal of an amusement permit, notice of which hearing shall be mailed to the applicant at the address given in his application. Such hearing shall be before a hearing examiner designated by the board. At such hearing, the board shall present its reasons for its refusal or withholding of license, renewal or transfer thereof, or its refusal for renewal of an amusement permit. The applicant may appear in person or by counsel, may cross-examine the witnesses for the board and may present evidence which shall likewise be subject to cross-examination by the board. Such hearing shall be stenographically recorded. The hearing examiner shall thereafter report, with the examiner's recommendation, to the board in each case. The board shall thereupon grant or 20250SB0021PN0689 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 refuse the license, renewal or transfer thereof or the renewal of an amusement permit. In considering the renewal of a license or amusement permit, the board shall not refuse any such renewal on the basis of the propriety of the original issuance or any prior renewal of such license or amusement permit. If the board shall refuse such license, renewal or transfer or the renewal of an amusement permit, following such hearing, notice in writing of such refusal shall be mailed to the applicant at the address given in his application. In all such cases, the board shall file of record at least a brief statement in the form of an opinion of the reasons for the ruling or order and furnish a copy thereof to the applicant. Any applicant who has appeared at any hearing, as above provided, who is aggrieved by the refusal of the board to issue any such license or to renew or transfer any such license or to issue or renew any amusement permit may appeal, or any church, hospital, charitable institution, school or public playground located within three hundred feet of the premises applied for, aggrieved by the action of the board in granting the issuance of any such license or the transfer of any such license, may take an appeal limited to the question of such grievance, within [twenty] thirty days from date of refusal or grant, to the [court of common pleas of the county in which the premises or permit applied for is located.] Commonwealth Court in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 763(a)(2) (relating to direct appeals from government agencies), which shall apply an appellate standard of review. The appeal shall be based solely on the record before the board and the decision of the board. If the application is for an economic development license under section 461(b.1) or the intermunicipal transfer of a license, the governing body of the municipality receiving the new license 20250SB0021PN0689 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or the transferred license may file an appeal of the board decision granting the license, within [twenty] thirty days of the date of the board's decision, to the [court of common pleas of the county in which the proposed premises is located. Such appeal shall be upon petition of the aggrieved party, who shall serve a copy thereof upon the board, whereupon a hearing shall be held upon the petition by the court upon ten days' notice to the board. The said appeal shall act as a supersedeas unless upon sufficient cause shown the court shall determine otherwise. The court shall hear the application de novo on questions of fact, administrative discretion and such other matters as are involved, at such time as it shall fix, of which notice shall be given to the board.] Commonwealth Court in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 763(a)(2), which shall apply an appellate standard of review. The appeal shall be based solely on the record before the board and the decision of the board. The court shall either [sustain or over-rule] affirm or reverse the action of the board [and either order or deny the issuance of a new license or the renewal or transfer of the license or the renewal of an amusement permit to the applicant]. The court, within its discretion, may also remand the matter to the board for purposes of accepting additional evidence or taking further action necessary to conduct appropriate appellate review.Section 470. Renewal of Licenses; Temporary Provisions for Licensees in Armed Service.--(a) (1) All applications for validation or renewal of licenses under the provisions of this article shall be filed at least sixty days before the expiration date of same, along with tax clearance from the Department of Revenue [and], the Department of Labor and Industry and any applicable local tax authority, the requisite license and filing 20250SB0021PN0689 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fees, and, except as provided under paragraph (2), shall include an application surcharge of seven hundred dollars ($700.00): Provided, however, That the board, in its discretion, may accept nunc pro tunc a renewal application filed less than sixty days before the expiration date of the license with the required fees, upon reasonable cause shown and the payment of an additional filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for late filing: And provided further, That except where the failure to file a renewal application on or before the expiration date has created a license quota vacancy after said expiration date which has been filled by the issuance of a new license, after such expiration date, but before the board has received a renewal application nunc pro tunc within the time prescribed herein the board, in its discretion, may, after hearing, accept a renewal application filed within two years after the expiration date of the license with the required fees upon the payment of an additional filing fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for late filing. Where any such renewal application is filed less than sixty days before the expiration date, or subsequent to the expiration date, no license shall issue upon the filing of the renewal application until the matter is finally determined by the board and if an appeal is taken from the board's action the courts shall not order the issuance of the renewal license until final determination of the matter by the courts. The board may enter into an agreement with the applicant concerning additional restrictions on the license in question. If the board and the applicant enter into such an agreement, such agreement shall be binding on the applicant. Failure by the applicant to adhere to the agreement will be sufficient cause to form the basis for a citation under section 471 and for the nonrenewal of the license 20250SB0021PN0689 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this section. A renewal application will not be considered filed unless accompanied by the requisite filing and license fees and any additional filing fee required by this section. Unless the board shall have given ten days' previous notice to the applicant of objections to the renewal of his license, based upon violation by the licensee or his servants, agents or employes of any of the laws of the Commonwealth or regulations of the board relating to the manufacture, transportation, use, storage, importation, possession or sale of liquors, alcohol or malt or brewed beverages, or the conduct of a licensed establishment, or unless the applicant has by his own act become a person of ill repute, or unless the premises do not meet the requirements of this act or the regulations of the board, the license of a licensee shall be renewed. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a noise violation shall not be the sole basis for objection by the board to the renewal of a license unless the licensee has received three prior adjudicated noise citations within a twenty-four-month period.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 470.4. Failure to Maintain Minimum Requirements for Licensure.--(a) A licensee shall at all times maintain the minimum requirements to be eligible to hold and operate under a respective license to sell alcoholic beverages at the licensee's designated premises, including , but not limited to, maintaining sufficient seating, square footage, food, rooms and applicable health and sanitation permits.(b) The Bureau of Licensing shall be authorized to conduct inspections to assess whether licensees are maintaining the minimum requirements for licensure after being issued a license 20250SB0021PN0689 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to sell alcoholic beverages. Inspections may be conducted in response to complaints made by the public, on the initiative of the Bureau of Licensing or upon notification by the enforcement bureau or a county or municipal public health and safety official as to a potential deficiency. If the Bureau of Licensing, at any time after the issuance of a license, determines through reasonable inspection that a licensee no longer meets the minimum requirements of this act or board regulation to be eligible to hold and operate a license to sell alcoholic beverages, the Bureau of Licensing shall administratively suspend the license for a period of at least ten (10) days pending the outcome of an administrative hearing, which may result in the imposition of further penalties. The Bureau of Licensing shall notify a licensee of the administrative suspension by issuing a notice of deficiency letter in-person or mailed via United States mail to the licensee at the licensed premises.(c) Following issuance of a notice of deficiency letter under subsection (b), the matter shall be promptly scheduled for an administrative hearing before a board hearing examiner within ten (10) days of issuance of the notice under subsection (b). The Bureau of Licensing shall have the burden of presenting evidence to support administratively suspending the license. Upon an initial showing of administrative suspension, the burden shall shift to the licensee who shall demonstrate that the licensee has remedied the issue and will make a good faith effort to satisfy minimum requirements in the future. The licensee may appear in person or by counsel, may cross-examine the witnesses for the Bureau of Licensing and may present witnesses and evidence on behalf of the licensee. The hearing 20250SB0021PN0689 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be stenographically recorded and the hearing examiner shall prepare an expedited report, with the examiner's recommendation, for the board to consider in each case. The board shall render a decision as to the appropriate final penalty to be imposed. For the first substantiated occurrence of failing to maintain the minimum requirements for licensure, the board shall impose a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and a suspension of at least thirty (30) days. For a second substantiated occurrence of failure to maintain the minimum requirements for licensure within a twelve-month period, the board shall impose a fine of four thousand dollars ($4,000) and either further suspend for a period of sixty (60) days or permanently revoke the license. The licensee may file an appeal of the board's decision within thirty (30) days to Commonwealth Court in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 763(a)(2) (relating to direct appeals from government agencies), which shall apply an appellate standard of review.(d) If a notice of deficiency letter has been issued under subsection (b), the licensee may elect to waive the right to a hearing under subsection (c) and obtain immediate authority to operate by demonstrating that any issues of noncompliance have been corrected, paying a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and entering into a conditional licensing agreement requiring the licensee to immediately place the licensee's license into safekeeping to be transferred to a bona fide third-party purchaser if the licensee fails to maintain the minimum requirements for licensure for a second time within twelve months. The conditional licensing agreement under this subsection, if not violated, shall automatically expire twelve months from the date of execution. The waiver process set forth 20250SB0021PN0689 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in this subsection shall not apply in situations where a licensee's license has been administratively suspended by the Bureau of Licensing for a second time within the same twelve-month period.(e) Proceedings involving compliance issues under this section shall take priority over citation proceedings for the same occurrences brought by the enforcement bureau pursuant to section 471.(f) This section shall not apply to other violations of this act, regulations of the board or questions as to the continued fitness of a licensee which are currently addressed through the citation process under section 471 or the board's nonrenewal process under section 470(a.1).(g) In addition to the enforcement powers and duties under section 211, the enforcement bureau shall establish an inspection schedule which provides for the routine inspection of any licensee whose license has been administratively suspended under subsection (b) but who has subsequently regained operating authority. Routine inspections shall continue for a period of twelve months following the most recent administrative suspension period under subjection (b), but shall not be required in situations where the license has been revoked by the board under subsection (c) or while the license is in safekeeping because of a violation of a conditional licensing agreement as provided for in subsection (d).Section 4. Section 471(a) and (b) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 471. Revocation and Suspension of Licenses; Fines.--(a) Upon learning of any violation of this act or any laws of this Commonwealth relating to liquor, alcohol or malt or brewed 20250SB0021PN0689 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 beverages, or of any regulations of the board adopted pursuant to such laws, or any violation of any laws of this Commonwealth or of the Federal Government relating to the payment of taxes on liquor, alcohol or malt or brewed beverages by any licensee within the scope of this article, his officers, servants, agents or employes, or upon any other sufficient cause shown, the enforcement bureau may, within one year from the date of such violation or cause appearing, [cite] issue a citation to such licensee to appear before an administrative law judge, [not less than ten nor more than sixty days from the date of sending such licensee, by registered mail, a notice addressed to him at his licensed premises,] by registered mail addressed to the licensee at the licensed premises or by in-person service made to the licensee's board-approved manager, officer or owner at the licensed premises, to show cause why such license should not be suspended or revoked or a fine imposed, or both. The bureau shall also send a copy of the hearing notice to the municipality in which the premises is located.(b) Hearing on such citations shall be [held in the same manner as provided herein for hearings on applications for license.] before an administrative law judge in accordance with section 212. The hearings shall be scheduled not less than ten nor more than sixty days from the date a citation is issued. Continuance requests may be considered and granted by an administrative law judge upon reasonable cause being shown by the requesting party. If a continuance request is granted, the matter shall be rescheduled as soon as reasonably practicable for the parties and administrative law judge. Once a hearing has been held, the administrative law judge shall issue an adjudication and order no later than six months after the date 20250SB0021PN0689 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the hearing. Upon such hearing, if satisfied that any such violation has occurred or for other sufficient cause, the administrative law judge shall immediately suspend or revoke the license, or impose a fine of not less than [fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000),] two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both, notifying the licensee by registered letter addressed to his licensed premises. If the licensee has been cited and found to have violated section 493(1) insofar as it relates to sales to minors or sales to a visibly intoxicated person, section 493(10) insofar as it relates to lewd, immoral or improper entertainment or section 493(14), (16) or (21), or has been found to be a public nuisance pursuant to section 611, or if the owner or operator of the licensed premises or any authorized agent of the owner or operator has been convicted of any violation of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act," or of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to prostitution and related offenses) or 6301 (relating to corruption of minors), at or relating to the licensed premises, the administrative law judge shall immediately suspend or revoke the license, or impose a fine of not less than [one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000),] two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both. However, if a licensee has been cited and found to have violated section 493(1) as it relates to sales to minors or sales to a visibly intoxicated person but at the time of the sale the licensee was in compliance with the requirements set forth in section 471.1 and the licensee had not sold to minors or visibly intoxicated persons in the previous four years, then the 20250SB0021PN0689 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrative law judge shall immediately suspend or revoke the license, or impose a fine of not less than [fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000),] two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both. The administrative law judge shall notify the licensee by registered mail, addressed to the licensed premises, of such suspension, revocation or fine. In the event the fine is not paid within twenty days of the adjudication, the administrative law judge shall suspend or revoke the license, notifying the licensee by registered mail addressed to the licensed premises. Suspensions and revocations shall not go into effect until thirty days have elapsed from the date of the adjudication during which time the licensee may take an appeal as provided for in this act, except that revocations mandated in section 481(c) shall go into effect immediately. Any licensee whose license is revoked shall be ineligible to have a license under this act until the expiration of three years from the date such license was revoked. In the event a license is revoked, no license shall be granted for the premises or transferred to the premises in which the said license was conducted for a period of at least one year after the date of the revocation of the license conducted in the said premises, except in cases where the licensee or a member of his immediate family is not the owner of the premises, in which case the board may, in its discretion, issue or transfer a license within the said year. In the event the bureau or the person who was fined or whose license was suspended or revoked shall feel aggrieved by the adjudication of the administrative law judge, there shall be a right to appeal to the board. The appeal shall be based solely on the record before the administrative law judge. The board 20250SB0021PN0689 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall only reverse the decision of the administrative law judge if the administrative law judge committed an error of law, abused its discretion or if its decision is not based on substantial evidence. In the event the bureau or the person who was fined or whose license was suspended or revoked shall feel aggrieved by the decision of the board, there shall be a right to appeal [to the court of common pleas in the same manner as herein provided for appeals from refusals to grant licenses.] the board's decision within thirty days to Commonwealth Court in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 763(a)(2) (relating to direct appeals from government agencies), which shall apply an appellate standard of review. The appeal shall be based solely on the record before the administrative law judge and shall also include any administrative filings made by the parties before the board, as well as the board's decision. Each of the appeals shall act as a supersedeas unless, upon sufficient cause shown, the reviewing authority shall determine otherwise; however, if the licensee has been cited and found to have violated section 493(1) insofar as it relates to sales to minors or sales to a visibly intoxicated person, section 493(10) insofar as it relates to lewd, immoral or improper entertainment or section 493(14), (16) or (21), or has been found to be a public nuisance pursuant to section 611, or if the owner or operator of the licensed premises or any authorized agent of the owner or operator has been convicted of any violation of "The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act," or of 18 Pa.C.S. § 5902 or 6301, at or relating to the licensed premises, or if the license has been revoked under section 481(c), its appeal shall not act as a supersedeas unless the reviewing authority determines otherwise upon sufficient cause shown. In any hearing 20250SB0021PN0689 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on an application for a supersedeas under this section, the reviewing authority may consider, in addition to other relevant evidence, documentary evidence, including records of the bureau, showing the prior history of citations, fines, suspensions or revocations against the licensee; and the reviewing authority may also consider, in addition to other relevant evidence, evidence of any recurrence of the unlawful activity occurring between the date of the citation which is the subject of the appeal and the date of the hearing. If the reviewing authority is the board, no hearing shall be held on the application for a supersedeas; however, a decision shall be made based on the application, answer and documentary evidence under this subsection. If the application for a supersedeas is for a license that has been revoked under section 481(c), the reviewing authority shall grant the supersedeas only if it finds that the licensee will likely prevail on the merits. No penalty provided by this section shall be imposed for any violations provided for in this act unless the bureau notifies the licensee of its nature within thirty days of the completion of the investigation. Notice under this subsection may be satisfied by the issuance of a citation in accordance with this section if the citation is issued within thirty days of the completion of the investigation.* * *(g) If a licensee has been cited and found to have violated any provision of this act as it relates to failing to maintain the minimum requirements for licensure, the administrative law judge shall impose a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000) and immediately suspend the license for not less than thirty days for the first offense. For any second or subsequent violation 20250SB0021PN0689 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occurring within the same twelve-month period, the administrative law judge shall impose a fine of four thousand dollars ($4,000) and immediately suspend the license for not less than sixty days or revoke the license. If license compliance proceedings have been initiated pursuant to section 470.4, those proceedings shall take priority and shall preclude the imposition of any penalties under this section for the same instances of violations.Section 5. Sections 477 heading, (a), (b), (c), (d) and (f), 493.1(a) and (b) and 515 of the act are amended to read:Section 477. Applicants to Provide State and Local Tax Identification Numbers and Statement of State Tax Status; Waiver of Confidentiality of Information in the Possession of Local Tax Authorities or the Department of Revenue and Other Departments; Review of State or Local Tax Status.--(a) An applicant for the grant, renewal or transfer of any license issued pursuant to this article shall provide to the board, upon forms approved by the Department of Revenue and any applicable local tax authority, the following:(1) the applicant's State personal income tax identification number;(2) the applicant's State and local sales tax number;(3) the applicant's State corporation tax number;(4) the applicant's State employer withholding tax number;(5) the applicant's unemployment compensation account number; and(6) a statement that:(i) all State and local tax reports have been filed and all State and local taxes paid;(ii) all State and local taxes are subject to a timely 20250SB0021PN0689 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrative or judicial appeal; or(iii) all State and local taxes are subject to a duly approved deferred payment plan.(b) An applicant for the grant, renewal or transfer of any license issued pursuant to this article shall, by the filing of an application insofar as it relates to the board, waive any confidentiality with respect to State or local tax information regarding said applicant in the possession of the Department of Revenue, the Office of Attorney General [or], the Department of Labor and Industry or a local tax authority, regardless of the source of that information and shall consent to the providing of that information to the board by the Department of Revenue, the Office of Attorney General [or], the Department of Labor and Industry or a local tax authority.(c) Upon receipt of any application for the grant, renewal or transfer of any license issued pursuant to this article, the board shall review the State and local tax status of the applicant. The board shall request State and local tax information regarding the applicant from the Department of Revenue, the Office of Attorney General [or], the Department of Labor and Industry or a local tax authority and said information shall be provided.(d) The board shall not approve any application for the grant, renewal or transfer of any license issued pursuant to this article where the applicant has failed to:(1) provide any of the information required by subsection (a);(2) file required State or local tax reports; or(3) pay any State or local taxes not subject to a timely administrative or judicial appeal or subject to a duly 20250SB0021PN0689 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized deferred payment plan.* * *(f) Upon the required submission of the annual licensing fee or upon renewal, issuance or transfer of any license, if the Department of Revenue [or], the Department of Labor and Industry or a local tax authority notifies the board of noncompliance with the aforementioned provisions, the board shall not renew, issue, transfer or validate the license. Any appeal filed therefrom shall not act as a supersedeas.* * *Section 493.1. Rights of Municipalities Preserved.--(a) Nothing in this act shall be construed to preempt the right of any municipality to regulate zoning and enforce any other local ordinances and codes dealing with health and welfare, which may include, but not be limited to, food, sanitation, restroom or general business nuisance issues.(b) A municipality may file a petition with the board for an exemption from section 493(34) of this act for all the licensees within an identifiable area in the municipality. Prior to submitting a petition, the municipality shall adopt a local noise ordinance and a resolution adopted by its governing body confirming support of the petition, citing the noise ordinance and its intention to enforce the ordinance in place of section 493(34) of this act. Upon receipt of a petition, including a copy of the noise ordinance, a map of the area to be exempted and resolution, the board shall hold at least one (1) public hearing on the petition. The hearing may be held before a hearing examiner. The hearing shall take place within the identified area and must comply with the notice, recording and public participation requirements of 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating 20250SB0021PN0689 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to open meetings). Within sixty (60) days after receipt of the petition, the board shall disapprove the petition for an exemption in its entirety or may approve an area more limited for which the exemption will be granted if the board finds that granting the petition shall have an adverse effect on the welfare, health, peace and morals of the residents living in the vicinity of the identified area; otherwise, the board shall approve the petition. The board may place additional conditions on its approval such as limiting the duration of the approval and any other condition the board deems appropriate. There shall be a right to appeal to the [court of common pleas] Commonwealth Court in the same manner as provided by this act for appeals from refusals to grant licenses.* * *Section 515. Appeals.--The board, the enforcement bureau or any applicant or any licensee aggrieved by any decision refusing, suspending or revoking a license under the provisions of this article may appeal within thirty days to the [court of the county in which the licensed premises or the premises to be licensed are located. In the event an applicant or a licensee shall have no place of business established within the Commonwealth, his appeal shall be to the Commonwealth Court. Such appeal shall be in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).] Commonwealth Court in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 763(a)(2) (relating to direct appeals from government agencies), which shall apply an appellate standard of review. The appeal shall be based solely on the record before the board and the decision of the board. The court shall either affirm or reverse the action of the board. The court, within its discretion, may also remand 20250SB0021PN0689 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the matter to the board for purposes of accepting additional evidence or taking further action necessary to conduct appropriate appellate review.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0021PN0689 - 21 - 1234